Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.188.082

Mathematics, engineering, and science achievement program—Establishment and administration—Goals.

A program to increase the number of people from groups underrepresented in the fields of mathematics, engineering, and the physical sciences in this state shall be established by the University of Washington. The program shall be administered through the University of Washington and designed to:

(1) Encourage students in the targeted groups in the common schools, with a particular emphasis on those students in middle and junior high schools and the sixth through twelfth grades, to acquire the academic skills needed to study mathematics, engineering, or related sciences at an institution of higher education;

(2) Promote the awareness of career opportunities including the career opportunities of teaching in the fields of science and mathematics and the skills necessary to achieve those opportunities among students sufficiently early in their educational careers to permit and encourage the students to acquire the skills;

(3) Promote cooperation among institutions of higher education, the superintendent of public instruction and local school districts in working towards the goals of the program; and

(4) Solicit contributions of time and resources from public and private institutions of higher education, high schools, middle and junior high schools, and private business and industry.

[ 1990 c 286 s 1; 1989 c 66 s 2; 1984 c 265 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.625.210, 28A.03.432.]

NOTES:

Implementation—Funding required—1984 c 265: See note following RCW 28A.188.080.